Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2416
Previous work experience in health care administration, defined.

Previous work experience in health care administration means at least two years working full time as an administrator or director of nursing of a hospital with a long-term care unit or assisted-living facility or director of nursing in a nursing home.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 831.